Hawaii statutes.
[§196-8.5] Placement of
clotheslines. (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no person
shall be prevented by any covenant, declaration, bylaws, restriction, deed,
lease, term, provision, condition, codicil, contract, or similar binding
agreement, however worded, from installing a clothesline on any single-family
residential dwelling or townhouse that the person owns. Any provision in any
lease, instrument, or contract contrary to the intent of this section shall be
void and unenforceable.

(b) Every private entity may adopt rules that
reasonably restrict the placement and use of clotheslines for the purpose of
drying clothes on the premises of any single-family residential dwelling or
townhouse; provided that those restrictions do not prohibit the use of
clotheslines altogether. No private entity shall assess or charge any
homeowner any fees for the placement of any clothesline.

(c) For the purposes of this section:

"Clothesline" means a rope, cord,
wire, or similar device on which laundry is hung to dry.

"Private entity" means any
association of homeowners, community association, condominium association,
cooperative, or any other nongovernmental entity with covenants, bylaws, and
administrative provisions with which the homeowner's compliance is required. [L
2009, c 192, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next